Utah statutes.
59-2-701.   Appraisal by certified or licensed appraisers only -- Certification of elected county assessors.

(1)  Any person performing an appraisal for purposes of establishing fair market value of real estate or real property for the assessment roll shall be the holder of an appraiser's certificate or license issued by the Division of Real Estate under Title 61, Chapter 2b, except uncertified or unlicensed appraiser trainees may, for up to 36 months after the date of hire or appointment as an appraiser trainee, appraise property under the direction of a holder of an appraiser's certificate or license issued by the division.

(2)  The limitations on appraisal authority under Subsections 61-2b-10(1) and (2) and Section 61-2b-13 do not apply to a person performing an appraisal for purposes of establishing fair market value for the assessment roll.

(3)  The commission may prescribe additional requirements for any person performing an appraisal for purposes of establishing fair market value for the assessment roll.

(4)  The commission may, by rule, establish qualifications for personal property appraisers exempt from licensure under Title 61, Chapter 2b, Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Act.

(5)  It is the duty of a county assessor, as established in Section 17-17-1, to ensure that the assessor's office is in compliance with this section and any additional rules or requirements for property appraisers established by the commission.

